Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that county coroners occupy positions of significant public importance. By investigating unexpected deaths, coroners provide important public safety and public health services. Technical skill, and medical and legal investigative abilities are critical to perform this function. Coroner is not a political position, yet most counties are required to hold coroner elections.Many coroners or medical examiners in the state are already appointed and serving successfully. Counties with less than 40,000 may appoint a coroner in lieu of electing a coroner, while those with more than 250,000 may appoint a medical examiner. Having all counties, including those in between those thresholds, appoint rather than elect a coroner will end partisan elections for a nonpolitical position and increase accountability over an important county government function. Therefore, in order to better steward public funds, the legislature finds that coroners throughout the state should be appointed rather than elected.Sec. 2. RCW 36.16.030 and 2021 c 127 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided elsewhere in this section, in every county there shall be elected from among the qualified voters of the county a county assessor, a county auditor, a county clerk, ((a county coroner,)) three county commissioners, a county prosecuting attorney, a county sheriff, and a county treasurer((, except that in each county with a population of less than forty thousand the county legislative authority may determine that no coroner shall be elected and instead)). A noncharter county may have five county commissioners as provided in RCW 36.32.010 and 36.32.055 through 36.32.0556.(2) Each county legislative authority must appoint a coroner. If a county has an elected coroner as of the effective date of this section, the elected coroner may continue in office until the coroner's term of office expires, at which time the county legislative authority must appoint a coroner. In a county with a population of ((two hundred fifty thousand))250,000 or more, the county legislative authority may replace the office of coroner with a medical examiner system and appoint a medical examiner as specified in RCW 36.24.190. Any county may enter into an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW with an adjoining county for the provision of coroner or medical examiner services. ((A noncharter county may have five county commissioners as provided in RCW 36.32.010 and 36.32.055 through 36.32.0558.))Sec. 3. RCW 43.101.480 and 2021 c 127 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) All ((elected coroners, appointed)) coroners, persons serving as coroners, medical examiners, and all other full-time medicolegal investigative personnel employed by a county coroner's or medical examiner's office must successfully complete medicolegal forensic investigation training through the medicolegal training academy program within 12 months of being ((elected,)) appointed((,)) or employed unless otherwise exempted by the commission. This section does not apply to elected prosecutors who are coroners in their counties.(b) All part-time medicolegal investigative personnel employed by a county coroner's or medical examiner's office must successfully complete medicolegal forensic investigation training through the medicolegal training academy program within 18 months of being employed unless otherwise exempted by the commission.(2) The commission, in conjunction with the Washington association of coroners and medical examiners and a practicing physician selected by the commission, shall develop the medicolegal forensic investigation training curriculum and adopt the standards for the medicolegal training academy and any exemption from the requirement to complete the medicolegal forensic investigation training. The commission shall exempt from this requirement any coroner, medical examiner, or medicolegal investigative personnel who has obtained training comparable to the medicolegal forensic investigation training by virtue of educational or professional training or experience.(3) The commission must certify successful completion of the medicolegal forensic investigation training or exemption from the medicolegal training requirement within 60 days from the receipt of proof of completion or request for exemption.(4) The medicolegal forensic investigation training required under this section must:(a) Meet the recommendations of the national commission on forensic science for certification and accreditation; and(b) Satisfy the requirements for training on the subject of sudden, unexplained child death including, but not limited to, sudden infant death syndrome developed pursuant to RCW 43.103.100 and missing persons protocols pursuant to RCW 43.103.110.(5) Certification under this section is a condition of continued employment in a coroner's or medical examiner's office.(6) A county in which a coroner, person serving as coroner, medical examiner, or other medicolegal investigative employee, who has not otherwise been exempted by the commission, is not certified within 12 months of being elected, appointed, or employed as required by this section, may have its reimbursement from the death investigations account reduced as provided under RCW 68.50.104 until the office is in compliance with all requirements under this section.Sec. 4. RCW 36.16.050 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:Every county official before he or she enters upon the duties of his or her office shall furnish a bond conditioned that he or she will faithfully perform the duties of his or her office and account for and pay over all money which may come into his or her hands by virtue of his or her office, and that he or she, or his or her executors or administrators, will deliver to his or her successor safe and undefaced all books, records, papers, seals, equipment, and furniture belonging to his or her office. Bonds of elective county officers shall be as follows:(1) Assessor: Amount to be fixed and sureties to be approved by proper county legislative authority;(2) Auditor: Amount to be fixed at not less than ((ten thousand dollars))$10,000 and sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative authority;(3) Clerk: Amount to be fixed in a penal sum not less than double the amount of money liable to come into his or her hands and sureties to be approved by the judge or a majority of the judges presiding over the court of which he or she is clerk: PROVIDED, That the maximum bond fixed for the clerk shall not exceed in amount that required for the treasurer in the same county;(4) ((Coroner: Amount to be fixed at not less than five thousand dollars with sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative authority;(5))) Members of the proper county legislative authority: Sureties to be approved by the county clerk and the amounts to be:(a) In each county with a population of ((one hundred twenty-five thousand))125,000 or more, ((twenty-five thousand dollars))$25,000;(b) In each county with a population of from ((seventy thousand))70,000 to less than ((one hundred twenty-five thousand))125,000, ((twenty-two thousand five hundred dollars))$22,500;(c) In each county with a population of from ((forty thousand))40,000 to less than ((seventy thousand))70,000, ((twenty thousand dollars))$20,000;(d) In each county with a population of from ((eighteen thousand))18,000 to less than ((forty thousand))40,000, ((fifteen thousand dollars))$15,000;(e) In each county with a population of from ((twelve thousand))12,000 to less than ((eighteen thousand))18,000, ((ten thousand dollars))$10,000;(f) In each county with a population of from ((eight thousand))8,000 to less than ((twelve thousand))12,000, ((seven thousand five hundred dollars))$7,500;(g) In all other counties, ((five thousand dollars))$5,000;(((6)))(5) Prosecuting attorney: In the amount of ((five thousand dollars))$5,000 with sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative authority;(((7)))(6) Sheriff: Amount to be fixed and bond approved by the proper county legislative authority at not less than ((five thousand))$5,000 nor more than ((fifty thousand dollars))$50,000; surety to be a surety company authorized to do business in this state;(((8)))(7) Treasurer: Sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative authority and the amounts to be fixed by the proper county legislative authority at double the amount liable to come into the treasurer's hands during his or her term, the maximum amount of the bond, however, not to exceed:(a) In each county with a population of ((two hundred ten thousand))210,000 or more, ((two hundred fifty thousand dollars))$250,000;(b) In each county with a population of from ((one hundred twenty-five thousand))125,000 to less than ((two hundred ten thousand))210,000, ((two hundred thousand dollars))$200,000;(c) In each county with a population of from ((eighteen thousand))18,000 to less than ((one hundred twenty-five thousand))125,000, ((one hundred fifty thousand dollars))$150,000;(d) In all other counties, ((one hundred thousand dollars))$100,000.The treasurer's bond shall be conditioned that all moneys received by him or her for the use of the county shall be paid as the proper county legislative authority shall from time to time direct, except where special provision is made by law for the payment of such moneys, by order of any court, or otherwise, and for the faithful discharge of his or her duties.Bonds for other than elective officials, if deemed necessary by the proper county legislative authority, shall be in such amount and form as such legislative authority shall determine.In the approval of official bonds, the chair may act for the county legislative authority if it is not in session.Sec. 5. RCW 36.17.020 and 2021 c 127 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:The county legislative authority of each county or a county commissioner or councilmember salary commission which conforms with RCW 36.17.024 is authorized to establish the salaries of coroners and of the elected officials of the county. The state and county shall contribute to the costs of the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney as set forth in subsection (11) of this section. The annual salary of a county elected official shall not be less than the following:(1) In each county with a population of ((one million))1,000,000 or more: Auditor, clerk, treasurer, sheriff, members of the county legislative authority, and coroner, ((eighteen thousand dollars))$18,000; and assessor, ((nineteen thousand dollars))$19,000;(2) In each county with a population of from ((two hundred ten thousand))210,000 to less than one million: Auditor, ((seventeen thousand six hundred dollars))$17,600; clerk, ((seventeen thousand six hundred dollars))$17,600; treasurer, ((seventeen thousand six hundred dollars))$17,600; sheriff, ((nineteen thousand five hundred dollars))$19,500; assessor, ((seventeen thousand six hundred dollars))$17,600; members of the county legislative authority, ((nineteen thousand five hundred dollars))$19,500; and coroner, ((seventeen thousand six hundred dollars))$17,600;(3) In each county with a population of from ((one hundred twenty-five thousand))125,000 to less than ((two hundred ten thousand))210,000: Auditor, ((sixteen thousand dollars))$16,000; clerk, ((sixteen thousand dollars))$16,000; treasurer, ((sixteen thousand dollars))$16,000; sheriff, ((seventeen thousand six hundred dollars))$17,600; assessor, ((sixteen thousand dollars))$16,000; members of the county legislative authority, ((seventeen thousand six hundred dollars))$17,600; and coroner, ((sixteen thousand dollars))$16,000;(4) In each county with a population of from ((seventy thousand))70,000 to less than ((one hundred twenty-five thousand))125,000: Auditor, ((fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars))$14,900; clerk, ((fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars))$14,900; treasurer, ((fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars))$14,900; assessor, ((fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars))$14,900; sheriff, ((fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars))$14,900; members of the county legislative authority, ((fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars))$14,900; and coroner, ((fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars))$14,900;(5) In each county with a population of from ((forty thousand))40,000 to less than ((seventy thousand))70,000: Auditor, ((thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars))$13,800; clerk, ((thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars))$13,800; treasurer, ((thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars))$13,800; assessor, ((thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars))$13,800; sheriff, ((thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars))$13,800; members of the county legislative authority, ((thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars))$13,800; and coroner, ((thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars))$13,800;(6) In each county with a population of from ((eighteen thousand))18,000 to less than ((forty thousand))40,000: Auditor, ((twelve thousand one hundred dollars))$12,100; clerk, ((twelve thousand one hundred dollars))$12,100; treasurer, ((twelve thousand one hundred dollars))$12,100; sheriff, ((twelve thousand one hundred dollars))$12,100; assessor, ((twelve thousand one hundred dollars))$12,100; members of the county legislative authority, ((eleven thousand dollars))$11,000; and coroner, $11,000 or on a per case basis as determined by the county legislative authority;(7) In each county with a population of from ((twelve thousand))12,000 to less than ((eighteen thousand))18,000: Auditor, ((ten thousand one hundred dollars))$10,100; clerk, ((ten thousand one hundred dollars))$10,100; treasurer, ((ten thousand one hundred dollars))$10,100; assessor, ((ten thousand one hundred dollars))$10,100; sheriff, ((eleven thousand two hundred dollars))$11,200; members of the county legislative authority, ((nine thousand four hundred dollars))$9,400; and coroner, $9,400 or on a per case basis as determined by the county legislative authority;(8) In each county with a population of from ((eight thousand))8,000 to less than ((twelve thousand))12,000: Auditor, ((ten thousand one hundred dollars))$10,100; clerk, ((ten thousand one hundred dollars))$10,100; treasurer, ((ten thousand one hundred dollars))$10,100; assessor, ((ten thousand one hundred dollars))$10,100; sheriff, ((eleven thousand two hundred dollars))$11,200; members of the county legislative authority, ((seven thousand dollars))$7,000; and coroner, $7,000 or on a per case basis as determined by the county legislative authority;(9) In each county with a population of from ((five thousand))5,000 to less than ((eight thousand))8,000: Auditor, ((nine thousand one hundred dollars))$9,100; clerk, ((nine thousand one hundred dollars))$9,100; treasurer, ((nine thousand one hundred dollars))$9,100; assessor, ((nine thousand one hundred dollars))$9,100; sheriff, ((ten thousand five hundred dollars))$10,500; members of the county legislative authority, ((six thousand five hundred dollars))$6,500; and coroner, $6,500 or on a per case basis as determined by the county legislative authority;(10) In each other county: Auditor, ((nine thousand one hundred dollars))$9,100; clerk, ((nine thousand one hundred dollars))$9,100; treasurer, ((nine thousand one hundred dollars))$9,100; sheriff, ((ten thousand five hundred dollars))$10,500; assessor, ((nine thousand one hundred dollars))$9,100; members of the county legislative authority, ((six thousand five hundred dollars))$6,500; and coroner, $6,500 or on a per case basis as determined by the county legislative authority;(11) The state of Washington shall contribute an amount equal to one-half the salary of a superior court judge towards the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney. Upon receipt of the state contribution, a county shall continue to contribute towards the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney in an amount that equals or exceeds that contributed by the county in 2008.Sec. 6. RCW 36.24.205 and 2021 c 127 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Within 12 months of being ((elected or)) appointed to the office, a coroner or medical examiner must have a certificate of completion of medicolegal forensic investigation training that complies with the standards adopted for the medicolegal training academy adopted by the criminal justice training commission in conjunction with the Washington association of coroners and medical examiners and a practicing physician selected by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.480. This requirement does not apply to an elected prosecutor acting as the ex officio coroner in a county. All medicolegal investigative personnel employed by any coroner's or medical examiner's office must complete medicolegal forensic investigation training as required under RCW 43.101.480. A county in which the coroner or county medical examiner has not obtained such certification within 12 months of assuming office may have its reimbursement from the death investigations account reduced as provided under RCW 68.50.104.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---